Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 4 STATEWIDE MANAGED CARE SYSTEM
25.5-5-415. Medicaid payment reform and innovation pilot program - legislative declaration - creation - selection of payment projects - report - rules.

The general assembly finds that:

Increasing health-care costs in Colorado's medicaid program creates challenges for the state's budget. Further, the increasing health-care costs do not necessarily reflect improvements in either health outcomes for patients or in patient satisfaction with the care received;

Moreover, the fee-for-service payment model may not support or align financially with evolving care coordination and delivery systems;

The reform of medicaid payment policies offers a significant opportunity for the state to contain costs and improve quality;

New payment methodologies, including global payments, have been developed to respond to rising costs and the complexities of health-care delivery. Opportunities now exist to explore, test, and implement such payment reforms in the medicaid program.

The state department should explore how these new payment methodologies may result in improved health outcomes and patient satisfaction and support the financial sustainability of the medicaid program; and

The state department shall evaluate how successful payment projects could be replicated and incorporated within the state department's statewide managed care system.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that Colorado should build upon ongoing reforms of health-care delivery in the medicaid program by implementing a pilot program within the structure of the state department's statewide managed care system that encourages the use of new and innovative payment methodologies, including global payments.

There is hereby created the medicaid payment reform and innovation pilot program for purposes of fostering the use of innovative payment methodologies in the medicaid program that are designed to provide greater value while ensuring good health outcomes and client satisfaction.

The state department shall create a process for interested contractors of the state department's statewide managed care system to submit payment projects for consideration under the pilot program. Payment projects submitted pursuant to the pilot program may include, but need not be limited to, global payments, risk adjustment, risk sharing, and aligned payment incentives, including but not limited to gainsharing, to achieve improved quality and to control costs.

The design of the payment project or projects must address the client population of the state department's statewide managed care system and be tailored to the region's health-care needs and the resources of the state department's statewide managed care system.

A contractor of the state department's statewide managed care system shall work in coordination with the providers and MCEs contracted with the contractor of the state department's statewide managed care system in developing the payment project or projects.

The state department shall review and select payment projects to be included in the pilot program.

For purposes of selecting payment projects for the pilot program, the state department shall consider, at a minimum:

The likely effect of the payment project on quality measures, health outcomes, and client satisfaction;

The potential of the payment project to reduce the state's medicaid expenditures;

The state department's ability to ensure that inpatient and outpatient hospital reimbursements are maximized up to the upper payment limits, as defined in 42 CFR 447.272 and 42 CFR 447.321 and calculated by the state department periodically;

The client population served by the state department's statewide managed care system and the particular health needs of the region;

The business structure or structures likely to foster cooperation, coordination, and alignment and the ability of the contractor of the state department's statewide managed care system to implement the payment project, including the resources available to the contractor of the state department's statewide managed care system and the technological infrastructure required; and

The ability of the contractor of the state department's statewide managed care system to coordinate among providers of physical health care, behavioral health care, oral health care, and the system of long-term care services and supports.

For payment projects not selected by the state department, the state department shall respond to the contractor of the state department's statewide managed care system, in writing, stating the reason or reasons why the payment project was not selected. The state department shall send a copy of the response to the joint budget committee of the general assembly, the health and human services committee of the senate, and the health, insurance, and environment committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees.

The payment projects selected for the program must be for a period of at least one year and must not extend beyond the length of the contract with the contractor of the state department's statewide managed care system. The provider contract must specify the payment methodology utilized in the payment project.

Repealed.

MCEs participating in the pilot program are subject to the requirements of sections 25.5-5-402 (10) and 25.5-5-408 (1)(e) and (1)(f), as applicable.

Payments made to MCEs under the pilot program shall account for prospective, local community or health system cost trends and values, as measured by quality and satisfaction measures, and shall incorporate community cost experience and reported encounter data to the extent possible to address regional variation and improve longitudinal performance.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this section or state board rules to the contrary, it is the intent of the general assembly that total payments, adjustments, and incentives will be budget-neutral with respect to state expenditures. The state department shall not enter into a contract with a provider pursuant to this section if the state department estimates that total payments to the provider will be greater than without the contract.

Pilot program participants shall provide data and information to the state department and any designated evaluator concerning health outcomes, cost, provider participation and satisfaction, client satisfaction, and any other data and information necessary to evaluate the efficacy of the payment methodology.

The state department shall submit a report to the joint budget committee of the general assembly, the health and human services committee of the senate, or any successor committee, and the health and environment committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committee, as follows:

(I) On or before February 1, 2013, concerning the design and implementation of the pilot program, including a description of any payment projects received by the state department and the time frame for implementation;

(II) On or before September 15, 2014, concerning the pilot program as implemented, including but not limited to an analysis of the initial data and information concerning the utilization of the payment methodology, quality measures, and the impact of the payment methodology on health outcomes, cost, provider participation and satisfaction, and patient satisfaction;

(III) On or before September 15, 2015, concerning the program as implemented, including but not limited to an analysis of the data and information concerning the utilization of the payment methodology, including an assessment of how the payment methodology drives provider performance and participation and the impact of the payment methodology on quality measures, health outcomes, cost, provider satisfaction, and patient satisfaction, comparing those outcomes across patients utilizing existing state department data;

(IV) On or before April 15, 2017, and each April 15 that the program is being implemented, concerning the program as implemented, including but not limited to an analysis of the data and information concerning the utilization of the payment methodology, including an assessment of how the payment methodology drives provider performance and participation and the impact of the payment methodology on quality measures, health outcomes, cost, provider satisfaction, and patient satisfaction, comparing those outcomes across patients utilizing existing state department data. Specifically, the report must include:

An evaluation of all current payment projects and whether the state department intends to extend any current payment project into the next fiscal year;

The state department's plans to incorporate any payment project into the larger medicaid payment framework;

A description of any payment project proposals received by the state department since the prior year's report, and whether the state department intends to implement any new payment projects in the upcoming fiscal year; and

The results of the state department's evaluation of payment projects pursuant to paragraph (a.5) of this subsection (4).

The state department shall evaluate each payment project to determine:

(I) Whether the payment project offers the potential for better patient outcomes or improved care and the impact of better outcomes and improved care on medicaid costs;

(II) Whether the payment project creates the opportunity for administrative efficiency in the medicaid program;

(III) Whether the payment project is budget neutral or generates savings for the medicaid program; and

(IV) Whether the payment project resulted in changes in provider participation in the medicaid program, and the nature of those changes.

For purposes of evaluating the pilot program and payment methodologies, the state department may collaborate with a nonprofit entity or an institution of higher education to analyze and verify data and information received from pilot participants and to evaluate quality measures and the cost-effectiveness of the payment reforms.

The state department shall seek any federal authorization necessary to implement the pilot program.

The state department may promulgate any rules necessary to implement the pilot program.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1281), ch. 246, p. 1182, § 2, effective June 4.

L. 2016:

(1)(a)(V), (2)(c)(I), (2)(c)(III), (2)(d)(I), (4)(a)(II), and (4)(a)(III) amended and (1)(a)(VI), (4)(a)(IV), and (4)(a.5) added, (HB 16-1407), ch. 152, p. 453, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 2018:

(1)(a)(VI), (1)(b), (2)(b), (2)(c)(II), (2)(c)(III), (2)(d)(I), and (2)(d)(III) amended and (2)(d)(II) repealed, (HB 18-1431), ch. 313, p. 1889, § 6, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2)(c)(II)(C) is similar to former § 25.5-5-402 (6)(b)(II), as it existed prior to 2018. For a detailed comparison of this section, see the comparative tables located at the back of the index.

25.5-5-416. Report concerning efficient contracting in managed care - legislative declaration - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1281), ch. 246, p. 1186, § 2, effective June 4.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2013. (See L. 2012, p. 1186.)

25.5-5-417. Reducing unnecessary duplicative services in the accountable care collaborative program - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1196), ch. 201, p. 817, § 1, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 15, 2018. (See L. 2013, p. 817.)

25.5-5-418. Primary care provider sustainability fund - creation - use of fund.

The primary care provider sustainability fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of money transferred to the fund from the children's basic health plan trust created in section 25.5-8-105 (1) pursuant to section 25.5-8-105 (8)(b) and any other money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered money in the fund at the end of any fiscal year remains in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund. Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, the state department may expend money from the fund for the purpose of increasing access to primary care through rate enhancements for primary care office visits, preventive medicine visits, counseling and health-risk assessments, immunization administration, health screening services, and newborn care, including neonatal critical care. Money expended from the fund for the purposes of increasing access to primary care through rate enhancements supplements and does not supplant general fund appropriations for that purpose.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1408), ch. 153, p. 468, § 18, effective July 1.

25.5-5-419. Accountable care collaborative - reporting - rules.

In 2011, the state department created the accountable care collaborative, also referred to in this title 25.5 as the medicaid coordinated care system. The state department shall continue to provide care delivery through the accountable care collaborative. The goals of the accountable care collaborative are to improve member health and reduce costs in the medicaid program. To achieve these goals, the state department's implementation of the accountable care collaborative must include, but need not be limited to:

Establishing primary care medical homes for medicaid clients within the accountable care collaborative;

Providing regional care coordination and provider network support;

Providing data to regional entities and providers to help manage client care;

Integrating the delivery of behavioral health, including mental health and substance use disorders, and physical health services for clients;

Connecting primary care with specialty care and nonhealth community supports;

Promoting member choice and engagement;

Promoting telehealth and telemedicine;

Utilizing innovative care models and provider payment models as part of the care delivery system, including capitated managed care models within the broader accountable care collaborative;

Receiving feedback from affected stakeholder groups;

Establishing a flexible structure that would allow for the efficient operation of the accountable care collaborative to further include medicaid populations and services, including long-term care services and supports; and

Establishing a care delivery system and provider payment platform that can adapt to changing federal financial participation models or funding levels.

The state department shall facilitate transparency and collaboration in the development, performance management, and evaluation of the accountable care collaborative through the creation of stakeholder advisory committees.

On or before December 1, 2017, and on or before December 1 each year thereafter, the state department shall prepare and submit a report to the joint budget committee, the public health care and human services committee of the house of representatives, and the health and human services committee of the senate, or any successor committees, concerning the implementation of the accountable care collaborative. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the report required pursuant to this subsection (3) continues indefinitely. At a minimum, the state department's report must include the following information concerning the accountable care collaborative:

The number of medicaid clients enrolled in the program;

Performance results with an emphasis on member health impacts;

Current administrative fees and costs for the program;

Fiscal performance;

A description of activities that promote access to services for medicaid members in rural and frontier counties;

A description of the state department's coordination with entities that authorize long-term care services for medicaid clients;

Information on any advisory committees created, including the participants, focus, stakeholder feedback, and outcomes of the work of the advisory committees;

Future areas of program focus and development, including, among others, a plan to study the costs and benefits of further coverage of substance use disorder treatment; and

Information concerning efforts to reduce medicaid waste and inefficiencies through the accountable care collaborative, including:

The specific efforts within the accountable care collaborative, including a summary of technology-based efforts, to identify and implement best practices relating to cost containment; reducing avoidable, duplicative, variable, and inappropriate uses of health-care resources; and the outcome of those efforts, including cost savings, if known;

Any statutes, policies, or procedures that prevent regional entities from realizing efficiencies and reducing waste within the medicaid system; and

Any other efforts by regional entities or the state department to ensure that those who provide care for medicaid clients are aware of and actively participate in reducing waste within the medicaid system.

On or before December 1, 2017, the state department shall submit a report to the joint budget committee, the public health care and human services committee of the house of representatives, and the health and human services committee of the senate, or any successor committees, outlining the statutory changes needed to part 4 of this article 5 relating to the statewide managed care system, as well as any other sections of the Colorado Revised Statutes, in order to align Colorado law with the federal "Medicaid and CHIP Managed Care Final Rule", CMS-2390-F.

The state board shall promulgate rules implementing the accountable care collaborative.

The state department shall consider new technologies and business practices for medical management reform that would reduce medical costs due to misuse, overuse, waste, fraud, and abuse. Better drug management, especially of avoidable prescriptions and inefficient use of specialty drugs, would allow the entire prescription drug cost continuum to be managed more effectively to contain costs and achieve better patient outcomes. New technologies and business practices for medical management reform may also benefit Colorado by providing a more powerful medicaid enrollment platform that properly enrolls only those individuals who are truly eligible for medicaid benefits.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1353), ch. 231, p. 895, § 2, effective May 23.

25.5-5-420. Advancing care for exceptional kids.

Within one hundred twenty days of the enactment of the federal "Advancing Care for Exceptional Kids Act", subject to available appropriations, the state department shall seek any federal approval necessary to fund, in cooperation with hospitals that meet the specified requirements, the implementation of an enhanced pediatric health home for children with complex medical conditions. Requirements for participation by the state department, along with the requirement of an enhanced pediatric health home, are stipulated by the "Advancing Care for Exceptional Kids Act" and shall be complied with accordingly.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (SB 17-267), ch. 267, p. 1466, § 21, effective May 30.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-267, see section 1 of chapter 267, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

25.5-5-421. Parity reporting - state department - public input.

The state department shall require each MCE contracted with the state department to disclose all necessary information in order for the state department, by June 1, 2020, and by each June 1 thereafter, to submit a report to the health and insurance committee and the public health care and human services committee of the house of representatives, or their successor committees, and to the health and human services committee of the senate, or its successor committee, regarding behavioral, mental health, and substance use disorder parity. The report must contain the following information for the prior calendar year:

A description of the process used to develop or select the medical necessity criteria for behavioral, mental health, and substance use disorder benefits and the process used to develop or select the medical necessity criteria for medical and surgical benefits;

Identification of all nonquantitative treatment limitations that are applied to behavioral, mental health, and substance use disorder benefits and to medical and surgical benefits within each classification of benefits and a statement that the state is complying with 42 U.S.C. sec. 300gg-26 (a)(3)(A)(ii), as required by 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396u-2 (b)(8), prohibiting the application of nonquantitative treatment limitations to behavioral, mental health, and substance use disorder benefits that do not apply to medical and surgical benefits within any classification of benefits;

The results of analyses demonstrating that, for the medical necessity criteria described in subsection (1)(a) of this section and each nonquantitative treatment limitation identified in subsection (1)(b) of this section, as written and in operation, the processes, strategies, evidentiary standards, or other factors used in applying the medical necessity criteria and each nonquantitative treatment limitation to benefits for behavioral, mental health, and substance use disorders within each classification of benefits are comparable to, and are applied no more stringently than, the processes, strategies, evidentiary standards, or other factors used in applying the medical necessity criteria and each nonquantitative treatment limitation to medical and surgical benefits within the corresponding classification of benefits.

A report on the results of the analyses specified in this subsection (1)(c) must, at a minimum:

Identify the factors used to determine that a nonquantitative treatment limitation will apply to a benefit, including factors that were considered but rejected;

Identify and define the specific evidentiary standards used to define the factors and any other evidence relied on in designing each nonquantitative treatment limitation;

Provide the comparative analyses, including the results of the analyses, performed to determine that the processes and strategies used to design each nonquantitative treatment limitation, as written, and the written processes and strategies used to apply each nonquantitative treatment limitation for benefits for behavioral, mental health, and substance use disorders are comparable to, and are applied no more stringently than, the processes and strategies used to design and apply each nonquantitative treatment limitation, as written, and the written processes and strategies used to apply each nonquantitative treatment limitation for medical and surgical benefits;

Provide the comparative analyses, including the results of the analyses, performed to determine that the processes and strategies used to apply each nonquantitative treatment limitation, in operation, for benefits for behavioral, mental health, and substance use disorders are comparable to, and are applied no more stringently than, the processes and strategies used to apply each nonquantitative treatment limitation, in operation, for medical and surgical benefits; and

Disclose the specific findings and conclusions that indicate that the state is in compliance with this section and with the MHPAEA.

By October 1, 2019, for purposes of obtaining meaningful public input during the assessment process described in subsection (1) of this section, the state department shall seek input from stakeholders who may have competency in benefit and delivery systems, utilization management, managed care contracting, data and reporting, or compliance and audits. The state department shall consider the input received in conducting the analyses and developing the report pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the reporting requirement specified in this section continues indefinitely.

The state department shall contract with an external quality review organization at least annually to monitor MCEs' utilization management programs and policies, including those that govern adverse determinations, to ensure compliance with the MHPAEA. The quality review report must be readily available to the public.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1269), ch. 195, p. 2134, § 15, effective May 16.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Care Coverage Modernization Act") in HB 19-1269, see section 1 of chapter 195, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

25.5-5-422. Medication-assisted treatment - limitations on MCEs - definition.

As used in this section, "FDA" means the food and drug administration in the United States department of health and human services.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning January 1, 2020, each MCE that provides prescription drug benefits for the treatment of substance use disorders shall:

Not impose any prior authorization requirements on any prescription medication approved by the FDA for the treatment of substance use disorders;

Not impose any step therapy requirements as a prerequisite to authorizing coverage for a prescription medication approved by the FDA for the treatment of substance use disorders; and

Not exclude coverage for any prescription medication approved by the FDA for the treatment of substance use disorders and any associated counseling or wraparound services solely on the grounds that the medications and services were court ordered.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1269), ch. 195, p. 2136, § 15, effective May 16.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Care Coverage Modernization Act") in HB 19-1269, see section 1 of chapter 195, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

25.5-5-423. Independent review organization - review denial of residential and inpatient substance use disorder treatment claims - contract.

No later than July 1, 2023, the state department shall contract with one or more independent review organizations to conduct external medical reviews requested for review by a medicaid provider when there is a denial or reduction for residential or inpatient substance use disorder treatment and medicaid appeals processes have been exhausted.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2364, § 9, effective June 28.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

25.5-5-424. Residential and inpatient substance use disorder treatment - MCE standardized utilization management process - medical necessity - report.

On or before October 1, 2021, the state department shall consult with the behavioral health administration in the department of human services, residential treatment providers, and MCEs to develop standardized utilization management processes to determine medical necessity for residential and inpatient substance use disorder treatment. The processes must incorporate the most recent edition of "The ASAM Criteria for Addictive, Substance-related, and Co-occurring Conditions" and align with federal medicaid payment requirements.

On or before January 1, 2022, the state department shall incorporate the standards developed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section into existing MCE contracts, and each MCE shall adhere to the standards when conducting utilization management for residential and inpatient substance use disorder treatment.

On or before January 1, 2022, each MCE's notice of an adverse benefit determination must demonstrate how each dimension of the most recent edition of "The ASAM Criteria for Addictive, Substance-related, and Co-occurring Conditions" was considered when determining medical necessity.

Beginning October 1, 2021, and quarterly thereafter, the state department shall collaborate with the behavioral health administration in the department of human services, residential treatment providers, and MCEs to develop a report on the residential and inpatient substance use disorder utilization management statistics. At a minimum, the report must include:

The average length of an initial authorization and the average length of continued authorizations for each MCE and provider disaggregated by level of residential care;

Denials of initial authorizations reported for each MCE and provider and the reasons for the denials; and

The average response time for an initial authorization and continued authorization, disaggregated by each MCE; level of residential care, including the percentage of extensions granted to health-care providers to submit complete clinical documentation; retroactive authorization requests; incomplete authorization requests; and the number of requests that met and did not meet the state department's response time requirements.

The state department shall make the report developed pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section publicly available on the state department's website.

Any information required to be reported pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section may be aggregated as necessary to ensure confidentially pursuant to 42 CFR part 2.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2365, § 10, effective June 28.

L. 2022:

(1) and IP(4)(a) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1515, § 76, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

25.5-5-425. Audit of MCE denials for residential and inpatient substance use disorder treatment authorization - report.

No later than July 1, 2022, the state department shall contract with an independent third-party vendor to audit thirty-three percent of all denials of authorization for inpatient and residential substance use disorder treatment for each MCE.

Beginning December 1, 2022, and each December 1 thereafter, the state department shall submit the results of the audit conducted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and any recommended changes to the residential and inpatient substance use disorder benefit to the house of representatives health and insurance committee, the house of representatives public and behavioral health and human services committee, the senate health and human services committee, or their successor committees, and the joint budget committee.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2366, § 11, effective June 28.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.